Minnesota, session 2025-2026, HF3324.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin TIME-BASED WATER SOFTENER REPLACEMENT PROGRAM.new text end new text begin Subdivision 1. new text end new text begin Definitions. new text end new text begin (a) For purposes of this section, the following terms have the meanings given. new text end new text begin (b) "Contractor" means a Minnesota licensed plumber, water conditioning contractor, or installer. new text end new text begin (c) "Eligible replacement" means the replacement of a time-based ion exchange water softener with a demand-based ion exchange water softener that: new text end new text begin (1) softens incoming water of a hardness exceeding ten US grains per gallon to less than one US grain per gallon; new text end new text begin (2) has a salt efficiency greater than 3,500 grains per pound of salt; and new text end new text begin (3) is installed by a contractor between July 1, 2025, and June 30, 2027. new text end new text begin (d) "Rebate" means a rebate of $200, regardless of the size or cost of the work performed, equipment replaced, and equipment installed. new text end new text begin Subd. 2. new text end new text begin Rebate program. new text end new text begin The commissioner of the Pollution Control Agency must establish a program to provide rebates to the owner or lessee of a residential or commercial building who makes an eligible replacement. Under the program, the commissioner must require that: new text end new text begin (1) rebate applications include specifications about the equipment being replaced, the equipment being installed, the programming of the equipment being installed, and an estimate of the annual salt use of the newly installed equipment; new text end new text begin (2) contractors certify that the equipment will be installed and programmed in a manner that complies with this section; new text end new text begin (3) both the owner or lessee of the property and the contractor sign a rebate application; new text end new text begin (4) rebates will be sent to the owner or lessee of the property; and new text end new text begin (5) a contractor may sign no more than 30 rebate applications for the life of the program. new text end Sec. 2. new text begin APPROPRIATION; TIME-BASED WATER SOFTENER REPLACEMENT PROGRAM REBATES.new text end new text begin $....... in fiscal year 2026 is appropriated from the general fund to the commissioner of the Pollution Control Agency to issue rebates under the time-based water softener replacement program established under section 1. This is a onetime appropriation and is available until June 30, 2028. new text end